Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.005

Board meetings—Quarters at institutions.

The board shall meet at major state correctional institutions at such times as may be necessary for a full and complete study of the cases of all convicted persons whose durations of confinement are to be determined by it; whose community custody supervision is under the board's authority; or whose applications for parole come before it. Other times and places of meetings may also be fixed by the board.

The superintendents of the different institutions shall provide suitable quarters for the board while in the discharge of their duties.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 17; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 318; 1986 c 224 s 4; 1959 c 32 s 2; 1955 c 340 s 10. Prior: 1945 c 155 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 8, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10249-8, part. Formerly RCW 43.67.030.]

NOTES:

Application—Recalculation of community custody terms—2011 1st sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 9.94A.501.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Effective date—Severability—1986 c 224: See notes following RCW 9.95.001.